Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-178.01
Licensee; sale to person within motor vehicle; prohibited; exceptions.

(1) No licensee shall sell alcoholic liquor, including beer, to any person for consumption off the licensed premises while such person is in any manner within any motor vehicle except as provided in subsection (2) of this section.

(2)(a) A business holding a Class B, Class C, Class D, Class L, Class Y, or Class Z license to sell alcoholic liquor at retail may sell alcoholic liquor authorized under such license to a person twenty-one years of age or older within a motor vehicle if (a) the alcoholic liquor is sold along with food, (b) the motor vehicle is in park, and (c) the alcoholic liquor is placed in the trunk of the motor vehicle or the area behind the last upright seat of such motor vehicle if the area is not normally occupied by the driver or a passenger and the motor vehicle is not equipped with a trunk.

(b) A licensee which sells alcoholic liquor in the manner authorized under this section shall provide notice to the commission during initial licensure or at the time of the licensee's annual renewal regarding such sales.

(3) This section shall not apply to sales to handicapped persons in a motor vehicle displaying a current handicapped license plate issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

Laws 1965, c. 318, § 17, p. 903;

Laws 1973, LB 111, § 7;

Laws 1978, LB 386, § 7;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 53-160.08;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 60;

Laws 2021, LB274, § 18.
May 26, 2021